Utah statutes.
10-5-115.   Expenditures limited to appropriations -- Obligations in excess invalid -- Processing claims required.

Town officers may not make or incur expenditures or encumbrances in excess of total appropriations for any department in the budget as adopted or as subsequently amended.  Any obligation contracted by any such officer may not be or become valid or enforceable against the town.  No check or warrant to cover any claim against any appropriation shall be drawn until the claim has been processed as provided by this chapter.

